North Carolina, session 2025, HB283.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 143B-437.71 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.71. One North Carolina Fund established as a special revenue fund.
(a) Establishment. – The One North Carolina Fund is established as a special revenue
fund in the Department of Commerce.
(b) Purposes. – Moneys in the One North Carolina Fund may only be allocated pursuant
to this subsection. Moneys may be allocated to (i) local governments for use in connection with
securing commitments for the recruitment, expansion, or retention of new and existing businesses
and to businesses, (ii) the One North Carolina Small Business Account Small Business Research
and Technology Account created pursuant to subsection (c) of this section in an amount not to
exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000). ($3,000,000), and (iii) the Small Business Investment
Grant Account created pursuant to subsection (d) of this section in an amount not to exceed ten
million dollars ($10,000,000). Moneys in the One North Carolina Fund allocated to local
governments under this subsection shall be used for the following purposes only:
(1) Installation or purchase of equipment.
(2) Structural repairs, improvements, or renovations to existing buildings to be
used for expansion.
(3) Construction of or improvements to new or existing water, sewer, gas, or
electric utility distribution lines or equipment for existing buildings.
(4) Construction of or improvements to new or existing water, sewer, gas, or
electric utility distribution lines or equipment for new or proposed buildings
to be used for manufacturing and industrial operations.
(5) Any other purposes specifically provided by an act of the General Assembly.
(b1) Awards. – The amounts committed in Governor's Letters issued in a single fiscal year
may not exceed seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000). Of the amount authorized in this
subsection, three million dollars ($3,000,000) is reserved for agreements with local governments
located in development tier three areas, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, with total employment
of 115,000 or less, using the data specified in G.S. 143B-437.52(c)(3).
*H283-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Small Business Research and Technology Account. – There is created in the One
North Carolina Fund a special account, the One North Carolina Small Business Account, Small
Business Research and Technology Account, to be used for the North Carolina SBIR/STTR
Incentive Program and the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program, as specified in
Part 2I of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes.
(d) Small Business Investment Grant Account. – There is created in the One North
Carolina Fund a special account, the Small Business Investment Grant Account (SBIG), to be
used to provide competitive grants to eligible small businesses to offset costs associated with
establishing a new facility or expanding an existing facility in the State, in accordance with this
subsection. The Department shall administer the program and shall prioritize grants to recipients
that the Department determines will have the greatest net economic benefit at the regional and
State levels. Grants to a recipient under this subsection may not exceed (i) five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) in any single calendar year, (ii) two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) total, and (iii) a term of distribution greater than five years. An eligible small
business is a business that meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Has 250 or fewer full-time employees, including full-time equivalents or has
less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in annual gross revenue.
(2) Will invest at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000), but not more than thirty
million dollars ($30,000,000) in private funds, and hire not more than 250 new
employees, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.51, in this State.
(3) Pays employees an average weekly wage that is at least equal to one hundred
ten percent (110%) of the average wage for all insured private employers in
the county."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 143B-437.80(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Program. – There is established the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Incentive Program
to be administered by the North Carolina Board of Science, Technology, and Innovation. In order
to foster job creation and economic development throughout the State, the Board may provide
grants to eligible businesses to offset costs associated with applying for federal Small Business
Innovative Research (SBIR) grants or Small Business Technology Transfer Research (STTR)
grants. The grants shall be paid from the One North Carolina Small Business Account Small
Business Research and Technology Account established in G.S. 143B-437.71."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 143B-437.83 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.83. Reports.
The Department of Commerce shall publish a report on the use of funds in the One North
Carolina Small Business Account Small Business Research and Technology Account on
September 1 of each year until all funds have been expended. The report shall contain information
on the disbursement and use of funds allocated under the One North Carolina Small Business
Program. The report must be submitted to the following:
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 283-First Edition